Tennessee statutes. Title 64 Regional Authorities
Part 7

Tellico Reservoir Development Agency

64-1-701. Creation — Purposes — Declaration of public function.

There is hereby created and established the Tellico Reservoir development agency, being a public body corporate and politic, referred to as the “agency” in this part.

The agency is created for the purpose of developing and effectuating plans and programs for the comprehensive development of, acquiring, operating, managing, selling, leasing and the development of all or a portion of the lands lying within the Tennessee Valley authority Tellico Reservoir project area, as shown on the official tract maps of the Tennessee Valley authority, and such contiguous lands as may be acquired by or transferred to the agency within the watershed of the Little Tennessee River, including portions of Monroe, Loudon and Blount counties, referred to as “development lands” in this part, all in accordance with the public purposes for which the Tellico Reservoir project was established and developed.

The development, management and operation of lands and facilities within the development lands set forth in subsection (b) by the agency are declared to be essentially public and governmental functions. The powers and authorities granted in connection therewith are declared to be public and corporate purposes and matters of public necessity.

Acts 1982, ch. 679, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. The Tellico Reservoir development agency, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2022. See §§4-29-112,4-29-243.

Attorney General Opinions. Authority of city to require building permit on property covered by development plan, OAG 97-136, 1997 Tenn. AG LEXIS 169 (9/30/97).

64-1-702. Board of directors — Officers — Meetings — Expenses.

The organization of the agency shall be as follows:

The agency shall be governed by a board of directors consisting of nine (9) members;

The county mayors of Monroe, Loudon and Blount counties shall be members of the board of directors;

The county mayor of each of the counties named in subdivision (a)(2) shall appoint, with the advice and consent of the county commission, persons to fill two (2) directorships from each county. In the selection of nominees for the board of directors, due consideration shall be given to persons active in municipal, industrial, agricultural, community, commercial and citizen organizations. The initial directors appointed to the board pursuant to the procedure set out in this subdivision (a)(3) shall serve terms as follows: Two (2) for terms of two (2) years; two (2) for terms of four (4) years; and two (2) for terms of six (6) years. The selection of directors to fill these terms of office shall be by random selection. The term of a director shall continue in any event until a successor is appointed. Successors shall be appointed in the manner set forth for the initial board of directors and shall serve for terms of six (6) years. In the event of a vacancy on the board, a successor shall be appointed for the unexpired term in the same manner as set forth for the initial directors.

Upon completion of its membership, the appointees shall meet and organize, elect a chair, vice chair and secretary-treasurer, and set a time and place for regular meetings of the board of directors, which shall occur no less frequently than once during every three (3) months.

The board of directors may provide that directors be compensated for attendance at regular meetings of the board of directors and at meetings of duly designated committees of the board in an amount to be specified by the board, which amount shall not exceed twice the minimum rate of compensation provided for counties of the third class in § 5-5-107, for regular meetings of the board of directors and one and one-half (1½) of such amount for meetings of committees of the board of directors. Directors shall serve without further or additional compensation except reimbursement for actual travel expenses and other necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their official duties, such expenses to be reimbursed from such funds as may be available to the agency. All reimbursement for travel expenses shall be in accordance with the comprehensive travel regulations as promulgated by the department of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter.

Acts 1982, ch. 679, § 3; 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

64-1-703. Powers and duties.

The powers, duties and functions of the agency are to:

General:

Have perpetual succession in the corporate name;

Sue and be sued in the corporate name;

Adopt, use and alter a corporate seal, which shall be judicially noticed;

Enter into such contracts and cooperative agreements with the United States and the Tennessee Valley authority for the development, management and sale of the development lands containing such terms and conditions as the board of directors may deem necessary or convenient, respecting the exercise of any and all rights, powers and authorities granted to the agency under this part;

Enter into such contracts and cooperative agreements with other federal, state and local governments, with agencies of such governments, with private individuals, corporations, associations and other organizations as the board of directors may deem necessary or convenient to enable it to carry out the purposes of this part;

Adopt, amend and repeal bylaws;

Appoint such managers, officers, employees, attorneys and agents as the board deems necessary for the transaction of its business, fix their compensation, define their duties and require bonds of such of them as the board may determine. This authority includes, without limitation, the appointment of an executive director of the agency who shall be in charge of the day-to-day operations of the agency and a treasurer who shall be charged with responsibility for maintaining the books of account of the agency and control of the deposit and disbursement of the funds of the agency. The salary of any such employees may be paid out of such funds as may be available to the agency from any source;

Apply for or accept grants, loans or other financial assistance from any federal, state, county or municipal agency, in aid of the acquisition, planning, development, management or operation of the lands, improvements to lands or facilities provided for in this part;

Accept donations to the agency of cash, lands or other property to be used in furtherance of the purposes of the agency;

Purchase, rent, lease or otherwise acquire any and all kinds of property, real, personal or mixed, tangible or intangible, or interests therein, and whether or not subject to encumbrances of any kind, that the agency deems necessary or convenient to carry out its purposes;

Establish and charge such fees for the use of lands, interests in lands, or facilities the agency may acquire or construct as the agency deems appropriate;

Promulgate and enforce such rules and regulations with respect to the use of lands, interests in lands or facilities the agency may acquire or construct that the agency deems necessary to protect such lands and facilities, to provide for the convenient and safe use thereof, or to provide for the orderly administration and efficient operation thereof;

Sell, transfer, lease or otherwise dispose of any personal property, tangible or intangible, of the agency, including sales, leases and transfers to industrial, commercial and residential developers, for such consideration and upon such terms as the agency deems appropriate;

Acquire such property of any kind, real, personal or mixed, or any interest therein, including leaseholds or easements, that is located within the boundary of the Tellico Reservoir project area as shown on the official tract maps of the Tennessee Valley authority and that the agency determines is necessary to carry out its purposes. The amount and character of lands or interests therein to be acquired by the agency shall be determined by the board;

The agency has any further or additional powers as are necessary to carry out the purposes of this part, and the powers set forth in this section are supplemental to and not in derogation of the powers afforded such agencies under the laws of the state;

Provide for the comprehensive development of the development lands through construction of facilities, including, without limitation, roads, water treatment and distribution systems, waste water treatment and collection systems, gas systems, electric utilities and such other public works projects as are set forth in former § 5-11-102(9) [repealed];

Financing:

The agency has the authority to borrow funds from time to time in such amounts as may be determined by the board of directors for the purpose of paying in whole or in part the cost of the acquisition of land or interests in land, for the improvement of the land or for constructing facilities within or in conjunction with the development of such land, and the necessary expenses incidental thereto or for any other purpose in furtherance of the purposes of this part;

The agency may secure such borrowings by the issuance of bonds, notes or instruments of indebtedness and may secure such bonds, notes or instruments of indebtedness by a pledge of all or any of the revenues which may now or hereafter come to the agency from any source, by a mortgage or deed of trust of the agency's land or any part of the land or interest in the land, or by a combination of the two;

The agency may make such contracts in the issuance of such bonds, notes or instruments of indebtedness as may be necessary to assure the marketability thereof;

The agency is hereby declared to be performing a public function on behalf of the state and the municipalities that constitute and are represented on its board of directors. Accordingly, the agency and all properties at any time owned by it and the income and revenues therefrom and all bonds issued by it and the income therefrom are exempt from all taxation in this state. For purposes of the Securities Act of 1980, compiled in title 48, chapter 1, part 1, and any amendment to the act or substitution for the act, bonds issued by the agency are deemed to be securities issued by a public instrumentality or a political subdivision of the state;

So long as title to land or rights or interests acquired in land or ownership of facilities or improvements acquired or constructed by the agency under the authority of this part shall remain in the agency, such property and the income therefrom shall be exempt from all state, county and municipal taxation. Such exemption shall not extend to the leasehold or other interest in such property that may be held by any private person or private firm or corporation; and

Nothing contained within this part shall be construed to grant the power of eminent domain to the agency.

Acts 1982, ch. 679, § 4; 1984, ch. 913, §§ 4-6.

Compiler's Notes. Section 5-11-102, referred to in this section, was repealed by Acts 1988, ch. 750.

Section 5-11-102, referred to in this section, is now set out as reserved.

64-1-704. Bonds.

Except as otherwise expressly provided in this section, all bonds issued by the agency are payable solely out of the revenues and receipts derived from the agency's projects or of any thereof as may be designated in the proceedings of the board of directors under which the bonds are authorized to be issued, including debt obligations of the lessee or contracting party obtained from or in connection with the financing of a project; provided, that notes issued in anticipation of the issuance of bonds may be retired out of the proceeds of such bonds.

Such bonds may be executed and delivered by the agency at any time and from time to time, may be in such form and denominations and of such terms and maturities, may be in registered or bearer form either as to principal or interest or both, may be payable in such installments and at such time or times not exceeding forty (40) years from the date thereof, may be payable at such place or places whether within or without this state, may bear interest at such rate or rates payable at such time or times and at such place or places and evidenced in such manner, may be executed by such officers of the agency and may contain such provisions not inconsistent herewith, all as are provided in the proceedings of the board of directors whereunder the bonds are authorized to be issued.

If deemed advisable by the board of directors, there may be retained in the proceedings under which any bonds of the agency are authorized to be issued an option to redeem all or any part thereof as may be specified in such proceedings, at such price or prices and after such notice or notices and on such terms and conditions as may be set forth in such proceedings and as may be briefly recited in the face of the bonds, but nothing contained in this subdivision (a)(3) shall be construed to confer on the agency any right or option to redeem any bonds except as may be provided in the proceedings under which they shall be issued.

Any bonds of the agency may be sold at public or private sale in such manner, at such price and from time to time as may be determined by the board of directors of the agency to be most advantageous, and the agency may pay all expenses, premiums and commissions that its board of directors may deem necessary or advantageous in connection with the issuance thereof.

Issuance by the agency of one (1) or more series of bonds for one (1) or more purposes does not preclude it from issuing other bonds in connection with the same project or any other project, but the proceedings whereunder any subsequent bonds may be issued shall recognize and protect any prior pledge or mortgage made for any prior issue of bonds.

Proceeds of bonds issued by the agency may be used for the purposes of:

Constructing, acquiring, reconstructing, improving, equipping, furnishing, bettering or extending any project or projects, including the payment of interest on the bonds during construction of any such project and for two (2) years after the estimated date of completion;

Payment of engineering, fiscal, architectural and legal expenses incurred in connection with such project and the issuance of the bonds; and

The establishment of a reasonable reserve fund for the payment of principal of and interest on such bonds in the event of a deficiency in the revenues and receipts available for such payment.

Any bonds or notes of the agency at any time outstanding may at any time and from time to time be refunded by the agency by the issuance of its refunding bonds in such amount as the board of directors may deem necessary, but not exceeding the sum of the following:

The principal amount of the obligations being refinanced;

Applicable redemption premiums thereon;

Unpaid interest on such obligations to the date of delivery or exchange of the refunding bonds;

In the event the proceeds from the sale of the refunding bonds are to be deposited in trust as provided in this section, interest to accrue on such obligations from the date of delivery to the first or any subsequent available redemption date or dates selected, in its discretion, by the board of directors, or to the date or dates of maturity, whichever shall be determined by the board of directors to be most advantageous or necessary to the agency;

A reasonable reserve for the payment of principal of and interest on such bonds and/or a renewal and replacement reserve;

If the project to be constructed from the proceeds of the obligations being refinanced has not been completed, an amount sufficient to meet the interest charges on the refunding bonds during the construction of such project and for two (2) years after the estimated date of completion, but only to the extent that interest charges have not been capitalized from the proceeds of the obligations being refinanced; and

Expenses, premiums and commissions of the agency, including bond discounts, deemed by the board of directors to be necessary for the issuance of the refunding bonds. A determination by the board of directors that any refinancing is advantageous or necessary to the agency, that any of the amounts provided in this subdivision (b)(7) should be included in such refinancing or that any of the obligations to be refinanced should be called for redemption on the first or any subsequent available redemption date permitted to remain outstanding until their respective dates of maturity shall be conclusive.

Any such refunding may be effected whether the obligations to be refunded have then matured or thereafter mature, either by the exchange of the refunding bonds for the obligations to be refunded thereby with the consent of the holders of the obligations so to be refunded or by sale of the refunding bonds and the application of the proceeds thereof to the payment of the obligations to be refunded thereby, and regardless of whether or not the obligations proposed to be refunded are payable on the same date or different dates or are due serially or otherwise.

Prior to the issuance of the refunding bonds, the board of directors shall cause notice of its intention to issue the refunding bonds, identifying the obligations proposed to be refunded and setting forth the estimated date of delivery of the refunding bonds, to be given to the holders of the outstanding obligations by publication of an appropriate notice one (1) time each in a newspaper having general circulation in the area and in a financial newspaper published in New York, New York, and having national circulation. As soon as practicable after the delivery of the refunding bonds, and whether or not any of the obligations to be refunded are to be called for redemption, the board of directors shall cause notice of the issuance of the refunding bonds to be given in the manner provided in this subsection (d).

If any of the obligations to be refunded are to be called for redemption, the board of directors shall cause notice of redemption to be given in the manner required by the proceedings authorizing such outstanding obligations.

The principal proceeds from the sale of any refunding bonds shall be applied only to:

The immediate payment and retirement of the obligations being refunded; or

The extent not required for the immediate payment of the obligations being refunded, then such proceeds shall be deposited in trust to provide for the payment and retirement of the obligations being refunded and to pay any expenses incurred in connection with such refunding; but provision may be made for the pledging and disposition of any surplus, including, without limitation, provision for the pledging of any such surplus to the payment of the principal of and interest on any issue or series of refunding bonds. Money in any such trust fund may be invested in direct obligations of the United States government, or obligations the principal of and interest on which are guaranteed by the United States government, or obligations of any agency or instrumentality of the United States government, or in certificates of deposit issued by a bank or trust company located in this state, if such certificates are secured by a pledge of any of such obligations having an aggregate market value, exclusive of accrued interest, equal at least to the principal amount of the certificates so secured. Nothing in this subdivision (f)(2) shall be construed as a limitation on the duration of any deposit in trust for the retirement of obligations being refunded but that have not matured and that are not presently redeemable or, if presently redeemable, have not been called for redemption.

All such bonds, refunding bonds and the interest coupons applicable thereto are hereby made and shall be construed to be negotiable instruments.

The principal of and interest on any bonds issued by the agency shall be secured by a pledge of the revenues and receipts out of which the same shall be made payable and may be secured by a mortgage or deed of trust covering all or any part of the projects from which the revenues or receipts so pledged may be derived, including any enlargements of and additions to any such projects thereafter made, and/or by an assignment and pledge of all or any part of the agency's interest in and rights under the leases, sales contracts or loan agreements relating to such projects, or any thereof. The resolution under which the bonds are authorized to be issued and any such mortgage or deed of trust may contain any agreements and provisions respecting the maintenance of the projects covered thereby, the fixing and collection of rents or payments with respect to any projects or portions thereof covered by such resolution, mortgage or deed of trust, the creation and maintenance of special funds from such revenues and from the proceeds of such bonds, and the rights and remedies available in the event of default, all as the board of directors deems advisable and not in conflict with this subdivision (h)(1).

Each pledge, agreement, mortgage and deed of trust made for the benefit or security of any of the bonds of the agency shall continue effective until the principal of and interest on the bonds for the benefit of which the same were made have been fully paid.

In the event of default in such payment or in any agreements of the agency made as a part of the contract under which the bonds were issued, whether contained in the proceedings authorizing the bonds or in any mortgage and deed of trust executed as security for the bonds, such payment or agreement may be enforced by suit, mandamus, the appointment of a receiver in equity or by foreclosure of any such mortgage and deed of trust, or any one (1) or more of the remedies.

Acts 1982, ch. 679, § 5.

64-1-705. Comprehensive development plan.

The agency shall investigate the resources of the Little Tennessee River watershed, and especially the Tellico Reservoir project area and the East Tennessee region and, based upon the foregoing study, shall develop a comprehensive development plan for the economic growth and residential, recreational, commercial and industrial development of the development lands.

In making such investigations necessary to the development of the comprehensive development plan and in formulating the comprehensive development plan, the agency shall seek the assistance of the Tennessee Valley authority and other federal, state and local agencies and of private citizens and citizen organizations interested in the conservation and development of the resources of the area.

Acts 1982, ch. 679, § 6.

64-1-706. Powers and duties with respect to development.

The agency may enter into contracts with municipalities, other public agencies or political subdivisions of any kind, corporations, public or private, or with others for the construction of facilities, utilities or for the provision of services within or in conjunction with development within the development lands that the agency determines are required for the development of the development lands or for the operation or management of such facilities.

The agency may develop, or provide for the development of, the development lands for recreational, residential, commercial and industrial purposes or for any other purpose consistent with this part and may provide for the development, management or operation of the development lands or facilities within such lands for these purposes, directly or by contractors, licensees, concessionaires, lessees or vendees.

The agency may sell or lease any development lands or interests for uses consistent with the agency's development plan, for such consideration and on such terms as the agency deems appropriate and necessary to effectuate the comprehensive development plan and subject to such restrictions as the agency deems necessary for the protection of the economic and environmental values within the Tellico Reservoir project area, including requirements related to:

The character or design of improvements and activities that may be undertaken on the development lands;

The time within which such improvements or activities shall be undertaken; and

The areas or places within such lands where such activities shall be undertaken.

The agency may acquire, construct or operate such facilities or other works of improvement or may undertake such site development activities as are necessary or convenient to effectuate its plans for the comprehensive development of the development lands and Tellico Reservoir project area.

The agency may enter into contracts with any city, county, municipal or other supplier of utilities for the abandonment, relocation, reconstruction, maintenance or other adjustment of roads, highways, bridges, utility lines or other facilities in, on, over or across the development lands or such areas adjacent thereto as may be necessary or convenient to carry out the purposes of this part.

The agency may acquire, construct, operate and maintain such public roads in, on, over or across the development lands or such areas adjacent thereto as may be necessary or convenient to carry out the purposes of this part.

Acts 1982, ch. 679, § 7.

64-1-707. Powers of represented counties.

The counties represented on the board of directors are hereby authorized and empowered to:

Contribute to the public works of the agency any amount or amounts of money that their respective governing bodies, acting in their sole discretion, shall approve to be paid from the general fund of the respective county. The county legislative bodies are empowered to levy and collect ad valorem taxes for such purposes, which are hereby declared to be for county public purposes; and

Issue their bonds as provided in former §§ 5-11-101 — 5-11-125 [repealed] to obtain funds for the financing of public works by the agency or to secure advances made to the agency for the construction of public works pursuant to cooperative agreements with the agency.

Acts 1982, ch. 679, § 8.

Compiler's Notes. Sections 5-11-101 — 5-11-125, referred to in this section, were repealed by Acts 1988, ch. 750.

Sections 5-11-101 — 5-11-125, referred to in this section, are now set out as reserved.

64-1-708. Annual report.

The board of directors of the agency shall report annually to the governing bodies of the various counties represented on the board of directors. Such reports shall include the statement of financial receipts and expenditures and a summary of all activities and accomplishments for the period and the proposed plans of the agency for the future development of the Tellico Reservoir project area and the development lands.

Acts 1982, ch. 679, § 9.

64-1-709. Cooperation with Tennessee Valley authority and other agencies.

All agencies of the state are hereby authorized and directed to extend their cooperation and lend assistance to the agency in the formulation and implementation of the agency's comprehensive development plan.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, upon enactment of this section, the comprehensive development plan, as adopted, approved and amended by the agency, shall control the development within the development lands acquired by the agency. Any municipal planning regulation adopted pursuant to title 13, chapter 4, any county zoning regulation adopted pursuant to title 13, chapter 7, any municipal zoning regulation adopted pursuant to title 13, chapter 7, that shall be adopted with respect to or shall apply to any portion of such development lands shall be superseded by the comprehensive development plan adopted, approved and amended by the agency, and, to the extent that same is inconsistent with the agency's comprehensive development plan, shall be of no force or effect as regards any such lands acquired by the agency.

The agency is further authorized and directed to contract and cooperate with the Tennessee Valley authority regarding the general development and management of lands within the Tellico Reservoir project area and to negotiate with the Tennessee Valley authority regarding cooperation by that agency in planning and financing the development of the Tellico Reservoir area.

Acts 1982, ch. 679, § 10.

Attorney General Opinions. Annexation of development lands, OAG 94-82, 1994 Tenn. AG LEXIS 86 (8/1/94).

64-1-710. Severability — Construction.

If any part, clause, sentence, paragraph or section of this part is held or declared to be unconstitutional or void, it shall not affect the remaining part or parts of this part. It is hereby declared to be the legislative intent to have passed the remainder of the part, notwithstanding any part held to be invalid.

This part shall be deemed to be remedial in nature and shall be liberally construed to effect its purposes.

Acts 1982, ch. 679, § 11.

64-1-711. Contracts — Bidding — Conveyances — Appraisals — Bonds and notes.

Notwithstanding this part to the contrary, all purchases of and contracts for purchases of goods and/or services or contracts for the conveyance of agency land in excess of two thousand dollars ($2,000) entered into by the Tellico Reservoir development agency shall be based on competitive bidding. The agency shall solicit sealed bids by public notice, setting out in detail the goods and/or services or agency land to be bid on, published at least twice in a newspaper or newspapers of general circulation in the counties served by the agency. All sealed bids shall be opened publicly at the time and place fixed in the public notice; and, in cases involving goods and/or services, the bidder making the best and lowest bid who is qualified to perform the contract shall be awarded the contract, while in cases involving conveyance of agency land, the bidder making best bid who is qualified to perform the contract shall be awarded the contract. Each bid with the name and address of the bidder shall be entered on a record and each record with the names of the bidders, the amount of their bids and the name of the successful bidder indicated thereon shall, after the award of the contract, be open for public inspection.

This subsection (a) does not apply to any contract for the conveyance of agency land for industrial development. The fair market value of such land, as of the time of the conveyance, shall be determined by at least two (2) independent, qualified appraisers, wholly disconnected from state government or any other legal governmental entity, and such property shall not be conveyed at a figure that is less than the average of the two (2) appraisals. This subsection (a) does not apply to any project submitted by the agency for Tennessee Valley authority approval prior to May 31, 1984.

Notwithstanding this part to the contrary, all notes and bonds of the Tellico Reservoir development agency shall be sold at public sale, at not less than ninety-eight percent (98%) of par value thereof and accrued interest, after not less than three (3) days' advertisement thereof in a newspaper or newspapers of general circulation in the counties served by the agency and in a financial newspaper published in the city of New York, New York or Chicago, Illinois with national circulation. Such notice shall be published at least ten (10) days prior to such sale.

No bond or note of the agency shall be issued until a memorandum detailing the bonds or notes to be issued together with a statement as of the beginning of the then current fiscal year, which statement shall show in detail the total outstanding bonds, notes, warrants, refunding bonds and other evidences of indebtedness of the agency, together with the maturity dates thereof, interest rates, special provisions for payment, the project to be funded by the bonds, the current operating financial statement of the agency and any other pertinent financial information, shall be submitted to the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee for review. The comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee may report thereon to the agency within fifteen (15) days from the date the plan is received and shall immediately acknowledge receipt in writing of the proposed bond issue statement and information. The report thus received by the agency shall be published once in a newspaper of general circulation in the counties served by the agency during the week following its receipt. After receiving the report of the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee, and after publication of such report, or after the expiration of fifteen (15) days from the date the statement and information is received by the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee, whichever date is earlier, the agency may take such action with reference to the proposed bond or note issue as it deems advisable. Such report of the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee shall also be made a part of the bond transcript.

Acts 1984, ch. 913, §§ 2, 3; 1985, ch. 142, §§ 1, 2; 2010, ch. 868, § 79.